Hawaii statutes.
§47-24 Validation of proceedings. All
proceedings heretofore taken with respect to the contracting of general
obligation bonded indebtedness and the issuance, sale, execution and delivery
of bonds by or on behalf of a county, are hereby validated, ratified, approved
and confirmed, notwithstanding any defects or irregularities in any such
proceedings or in the issuance, execution, sale or delivery, and the bonds so
issued or to be issued are and shall be binding, legal, valid and enforceable
obligations of the county. [L 1989, c 80, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next